Utah statutes.
13-22-19.   Reciprocal agreements.

(1)  The division may convey or exchange information obtained under this chapter with other agencies having regulatory authority over charitable organizations.

(2)  The division may accept information that a charitable organization or professional fund raiser files in another state or with any federal agency or other organization in place of substantially similar information that is required to be filed under this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 280, 1993 General Session

